Massachusetts, session 194th, H1650.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 269 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following section:--
Section 20. No person shall, within the commonwealth, manufacture or cause to be
manufactured, partially or completely, any assault weapon or large capacity feeding device as
defined in section 121 of chapter 140 of the General Laws. This prohibition shall not apply to
weapons or devices manufactured by a licensed manufacturer solely for the purpose of the lawful
sale to an authorized law enforcement or military agency of the commonwealth, any other state,
the United States, or a foreign government approved by the United States State Department.
Whoever violates this section shall be punished by a fine of not less than $1,000 nor more
than $1,000,000 or by imprisonment for not less than one year nor more than ten years, or by
both such fine and imprisonment.
of 1